Hawaii statutes.
[§671-7] Professional
liability insurance; coverage for telehealth. [Section effective
January 1, 2017.] (a) Every insurer providing professional liability
insurance for a health care provider shall ensure that every policy that is
issued, amended, or renewed in this State on or after January 1, 2017, shall
provide malpractice coverage for telehealth that shall be equivalent to
coverage for the same services provided via face-to-face contact between a
health care provider and a patient.

(b) No insurer providing professional
liability insurance policies shall require face-to-face contact between a
health care provider and a patient as a prerequisite for coverage of services
appropriately provided through telehealth in accordance with generally accepted
health care practices and standards prevailing in the applicable professional
community at the time the services were provided. The coverage required in
this section may be subject to all terms and conditions of the policy agreed
upon between the health care provider and the insurer.

(c) For purposes of this section:

"Distant site" means the location of
the health care provider delivering services through telehealth at the time the
services are provided.

"Originating site" means the location
where the patient is located, whether accompanied or not by a health care
provider, at the time services are provided by a health care provider through
telehealth, including but not limited to a health care provider's office,
hospital, critical access hospital, rural health clinic, federally qualified
health center, a patient's home, and other non-medical environments such as
school-based health centers, university-based health centers, or the work
location of a patient.

"Telehealth" means the use of
telecommunications services, as defined in section 269‑1, to encompass
four modalities: store and forward technologies, remote monitoring, live
consultation, and mobile health; and which shall include but not be limited to
real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure interactive and non‑interactive
web-based communication, and secure asynchronous information exchange, to
transmit patient medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital
images and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis, for the
purpose of delivering enhanced health care services and information while a
patient is at an originating site and the health care provider is at a distant
site. Standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail text, in
combination or by itself, does not constitute a telehealth service for the
purposes of this section. [L 2016, c 226, §4]

Revision Note

In subsection (a), "January 1, 2017" substituted
for "the effective date of Act [226], Session Laws of Hawaii 2016".

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next